Utah statutes.
63A-5-101.   Creation -- Composition -- Appointment -- Per diem and expenses -- Administrative services.

(1) (a)  There is created a State Building Board composed of eight members, seven of whom shall be appointed by the governor for terms of four years.

(b)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsection (1)(a), the governor shall, at the time of appointment or reappointment, adjust the length of terms to ensure that the terms of board members are staggered so that approximately half of the board is appointed every two years.

(2)  When a vacancy occurs in the membership for any reason, the replacement shall be appointed for the unexpired term.

(3)  The director of the Governor's Office of Planning and Budget or the director's designee is a nonvoting member of the board.

(4)  Each member shall hold office until a successor is appointed and qualified, but no member shall serve more than two consecutive terms.

(5)  One member shall be designated by the governor as chair.

(6)  A member may not receive compensation or benefits for the member's service, but may receive per diem and travel expenses in accordance with:

(a)  Section 63A-3-106;

(b)  Section 63A-3-107; and

(c)  rules made by the Division of Finance pursuant to Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.

(7)  The members of the board are not required to give bond for the performance of their official duties.

(8)  The department shall provide administrative and staff services to enable the board to exercise its powers and discharge its duties, and shall provide necessary space and equipment for the board.

